Hawaii statutes.
[§489E-13] Admissibility in evidence.
In a proceeding, evidence of a record or signature shall not be excluded solely
because it is in electronic form. [L 2000, c 282, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next